Wisconsin, session 2025, SB14.
do enact as follows:SB14,14Section 1. 50.373 of the statutes is created to read:SB14,2,3550.373 Informed consent for pelvic examinations. A hospital shall 1ensure that, before a pelvic examination is performed solely for educational 2purposes on a patient while the patient is under general anesthesia or otherwise 3unconscious, written informed consent is obtained from the patient.SB14,24Section 2. DHS 124.10 of the administrative code is created to read:SB14,2,95DHS 124.10 Consent policy for pelvic examinations performed for 6educational purposes. A hospital shall maintain written policies and procedures 7requiring written informed consent to be obtained from a patient before a pelvic 8examination is performed solely for educational purposes on the patient while the 9patient is under general anesthesia or otherwise unconscious.SB14,310Section 3. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the day after 11publication, except as follows:SB14,2,1312(1) The creation of s. DHS 124.10, Wis. Adm. Code, takes effect as provided in 13s. 227.265.SB14,2,1414